District of Columbia statutes.
28:1-107

Section captions.

Section captions are part of this subtitle.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 632, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-299, § 2, 60 DCR 2634
This section is referenced in § 28-4902.
2001 Ed., § 28:1-109.
1981 Ed., § 28:1-109.
1973 Ed., § 28:1-109.

Source: Former Section 1-109.

Changes from former law: None.

1. Section captions are a part of the text of the Uniform Commercial Code, and not mere surplusage. This is not the case, however, with respect to subsection headings appearing in Article 9. See Comment 3 to Section 9-101 (“subsection headings are not a part of the official text itself and have not been approved by the sponsors.”).